apertium-hbs.hbs.metadix
    <!--Modal verbs morati and trebati--><!--Note: they're put here, and not earlier, because of the suffixes-->
    <pardef n="mor/ati__vbmod">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vbmod__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vbmod"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>ati<s n="vbmod"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vbmod"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ati<s n="vbmod"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ajući</l><r>ati<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!--end Modal verbs morati and trebati-->
    <!--Verb to have-->
    <pardef n="imati__vbhaver">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r>ima</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vbhaver__imperf"/></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>ima</l><r>ima</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vbhaver__imperf"/></e> -->
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r>imati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>ima</l><r>imati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>im</l><r>imati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>im</l><r>imati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r>imati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>ima</l><r>imati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r>imati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>ima</l><r>imati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e> -->
      <e><p><l>imajući</l><r>imati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

      <!--The negative vbhaver--><!--Identicle save for the future. Identicool.-->
      <!--Infinitive--><!--Future tense makes no sence for the negative-->
      <!-- <e><p><l>nemati</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> -->
      <!-- <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nema</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vbhaver__imperf"/></e> -->
      <!--Imperative-->
      <!-- <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!-- <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!--Present-->
      <!-- <e><p><l>nem</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!-- <e><p><l>nem</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <!-- <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!-- <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!--Participles-->
      <!-- <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>nemajući</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e> -->
    </pardef>
    <!--end Verb to have-->
    <!--Defective verb paradigms-->
    <pardef n="veli__vblex">
      <!--Only present, it is otherwise defective-->
      <e><p><l>vel</l><r>veli<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vel</l><r>veli<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vel</l><r>veli<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vel</l><r>veli<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- end defective verb paradigms-->

    <pardef n="nemati__vbhaver"><!--fix: took it out so it works when paired with eng -->
      <e><p><l>nemati</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nema</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vbhaver__imperf"/></e> -->
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>nem</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>nem</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__am__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e> -->
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>nema</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>nemajući</l><r>nemati<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!--Regular verb paradigms-->
    <pardef n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>di</l><r>di</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>diti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>diti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>di</l><r>diti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>di</l><r>diti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>divši</l><r>diti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_tv_poz/vati__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>va</l><r>va</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Impergative-->
      <e><p><l>ov</l><r>vati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>ov</l><r>vati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>va</l><r>vati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>va</l><r>vati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>van</l><r>vati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vavši</l><r>vati<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <e lm="nemati"><par n="nemati__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="povlađivati"><i>povlađi</i><par n="perf_tv_poz/vati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imati"><par n="imati__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="morati"><i>mor</i><par n="mor/ati__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="trebati"><i>treb</i><par n="mor/ati__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="veli"><i/><par n="veli__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izazvati"><i>izaz</i><par n="perf_tv_poz/vati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sazvati"><i>saz</i><par n="perf_tv_poz/vati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prozvati"><i>proz</i><par n="perf_tv_poz/vati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nazvati"><i>naz</i><par n="perf_tv_poz/vati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pozvati"><i>poz</i><par n="perf_tv_poz/vati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="usporediti"><i>uspore</i><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uporediti"><i>upore</i><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rasporediti"><i>raspore</i><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="probuditi"><i>probu</i><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izgraditi"><i>izgra</i><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="osloboditi"><i>oslobo</i><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pobijediti"><i>pob</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i/><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utvrditi"><i>utvr</i><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ubijediti"><i>ub</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i/><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dogoditi"><i>dogo</i><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ponuditi"><i>ponu</i><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
